Illinois, session 104th, HB5772.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Division 29.4 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/Art. 11 Div. 29.4 heading new)7DIVISION 29.4. TEXT-A-PHYSICIAN AND OTHER TELEHEALTH SERVICES 8    (65 ILCS 5/11-29.4-1 new)9    Sec. 11-29.4-1. Text-a-physician and other telehealth 10services. 11    (a) As used in this Section:12    "Physician" means any person licensed to practice medicine 13in all its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987.14    "Telehealth" means the evaluation, diagnosis, or 15interpretation of patient-specific data that is transmitted by 16way of an interactive telecommunication system between a 17remote location and a physician located at a distant site that 18generates interaction or treatment recommendations for a 19patient located at a remote location.20    "Text-based health care services" means an asynchronous 21program that provides residents of a municipality with the 22opportunity to connect with licensed State medical   HB5772- 2 -LRB104 21601 TRT 37060 b1professionals, including, but not limited to, physicians, via 2text message to obtain answers to medical questions, guidance 3concerning medical issues, physician notes for work and 4school, and, if necessary, prescriptions for routine 5medications. "Text-based health care services" includes 6programs that provide text-a-physician services.7    (b) A municipality may enter into contractual agreements 8with a company that offers telehealth services or 9text-a-physician services or other text-based health care 10services.  11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 121, 2027.